Illinois, session 104th, HB3463.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.3c as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3c)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.3c)7    Sec. 10-22.3c. Orders of protection. To prohibit the 8disclosure by any school employee to any person against whom 9the school district has received a certified copy of an order 10of protection the location or address of the petitioner for 11the order of protection or the identity of the schools in the 12district in which the petitioner's child or children are 13enrolled. The school district shall maintain the copy of the 14order of protection in the records of the child or children 15enrolled in the district whose parent is the petitioner of an 16order of protection. Upon receipt of such an order of 17protection, the school district must notify and deliver a copy 18of the order of protection to the school resource officer as 19defined under Section 10-22.68 of the School Code. 20(Source: P.A. 87-437.)